Illinois, session 104th, SB316.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Artificial Intelligence Companion Model Safety Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Artificial intelligence" has the same meaning set forth 8in Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. "Artificial 9intelligence" includes generative artificial intelligence. 10    "Artificial intelligence companion" means a product that 11uses artificial intelligence or emotional recognition 12algorithms designed to simulate a sustained human or 13human-like relationship with a user by:14        (1) retaining information on prior interactions or 15    user sessions and user preferences to personalize the 16    interaction and facilitate ongoing engagement with the 17    artificial intelligence companion;18        (2) asking unprompted or unsolicited emotion-based 19    questions that go beyond a direct response to a user 20    prompt; and21        (3) sustaining an ongoing dialogue concerning matters 22    personal to the user.23    "Artificial intelligence companion" does not include:   SB0316 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1        (1) a bot that is primarily designed and marketed for 2    commercial use by business entities for customer service, 3    business operational purposes, productivity and analysis 4    related to source information, internal research, or 5    technical assistance; 6        (2) a bot that is a feature of a video game, film, 7    television program, other audiovisual work, theme park, or 8    location-based entertainment and is limited to replies 9    related to the entertainment that cannot discuss topics 10    related to mental health, self-harm, material harmful to 11    minors, or maintain a dialogue on other topics unrelated 12    to the forms of entertainment; 13        (3) a stand-alone consumer electronic device or a bot 14    incorporated into a stand-alone consumer electronic device 15    that functions as a speaker and voice command interface, 16    acts as a voice-activated virtual assistant, and does not 17    sustain a relationship across multiple interactions or 18    generate outputs that are likely to elicit emotional 19    responses in the user;20        (4) narrowly tailored educational tools used in school 21    or instructional settings that are designed solely to 22    support specific, curriculum-aligned learning objectives 23    and do not provide open-ended conversational 24    companionship; or25        (5) a bot used solely for motor vehicle operation or 26    navigation that cannot maintain a dialogue on topics   SB0316 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1    unrelated to motor vehicle operation or navigation.2    "Harmful to minors" has the same meaning set forth in 3Section 11-21 of the Criminal Code of 2012.4    "Human relationships" include, but are not limited to, 5intimate, romantic, or platonic interactions or companionship.6    "Minor" means any user under 18 years of age.7    "Operator" means any person, partnership, association, 8corporation, firm, or business entity who makes available an 9artificial intelligence companion for users in this State. 10"Operator" does not include an application store, operating 11system, or search engine that solely provides access to an 12artificial intelligence companion operated by another entity.13    "Product" means any tangible object or goods distributed 14in commerce, including any service provided in connection with 15the product.16    "Relationship" includes, but is not limited to, intimate, 17romantic, or platonic interactions or companionship.18    "Self-harm" means intentional self-injury with or without 19the intent to cause death. 20    "User" means any natural person who interacts with an 21artificial intelligence companion for personal use in this 22State and who is not an operator or agent or affiliate of the 23operator of the artificial intelligence companion. 24    Section 10. General companion artificial intelligence 25requirements.   SB0316 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1    (a) An operator shall not make available or deploy an 2artificial intelligence companion unless the artificial 3intelligence companion maintains and implements a protocol to 4detect and address suicidal ideation or expressions of 5self-harm by a user to the artificial intelligence companion. 6The protocol shall include, but not be limited to: 7        (1) implementing reasonable methods for detecting user 8    expressions of suicidal ideation or self-harm; 9        (2) providing a notification to the user that refers 10    them to crisis service providers, such as the 9-8-8 11    Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, a crisis text line, or other 12    appropriate crisis services upon detection of the user's 13    expressions of suicidal ideation or self-harm; and 14        (3) implementing reasonable measures to prevent the 15    generation of content encouraging or describing how to 16    commit self-harm.17    The operator shall publicly disclose, on the operator's 18website, a general description of the protocol required by 19this subsection, with sufficient detail for a user to know 20that the operator has protocols in place but not enough detail 21to circumvent the protocols, and the number of users who were 22provided a notification that refers a user to crisis services 23in the preceding year.24    (b) An operator shall provide a clear and conspicuous 25notification to a user, either verbally or in writing, in the 26language that the user is interacting and communicating with   SB0316 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1the artificial intelligence companion, that the user is 2communicating with an automated system and not with a human. 3The notification shall be provided: 4        (1) at the beginning of the interaction; and 5        (2) at least every 3 hours during continued 6    interaction. 7    The operator shall implement reasonable measures to 8prohibit and prevent an artificial intelligence companion from 9claiming to be human, including when asked by the user and from 10otherwise generating any output that refutes or conflicts with 11the disclosure described in this subsection.12    For the purposes of this subsection, a person is 13"interacting with" with an artificial intelligence companion 14when the person uses voice, physical or visual gesture, text, 15or touch contact as an input prompt to cause the artificial 16intelligence companion to react, respond, or learn from that 17prompt. 18    Section 15. Minor specific requirements. 19    (a) In addition to the requirements for all users under 20Section 10, an operator shall, for a user that the operator 21knows to be a minor, or if the operator's artificial 22intelligence companion is directed to minors, implement 23reasonable measures to prevent its artificial intelligence 24companion from generating or producing material that is 25harmful to minors or directly stating that the minor should   SB0316 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1engage in conduct that is harmful to minors.2    (b) For the purposes of this Section, an operator's 3knowledge that a user is a minor may be acquired from 4information and inferences known to an operator relating to 5the age of an individual by any source, including the age 6provided by the user in connection with the account, 7self-identified age in any chat or interaction to which the 8operator possesses a right of access or use, and any age the 9operator attributes or associates with the user for any 10purpose, including marketing, advertising, or product 11development. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted 12to require an operator to begin accessing or collecting any 13user information or data to which they do not have access or 14otherwise collect for purposes unrelated to this Act. 15    Section 20. Enforcement. 16    (a) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of any 17county in this State may bring an action in the name of the 18People of this State against any person to restrain and 19prevent any pattern or practice in violation of this Act. 20    (b) A violation of this Act constitutes an unlawful 21practice under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 22Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and authority granted 23to the Attorney General or the State's Attorney by the 24Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act shall be 25available to the Attorney General or the State's Attorney for   SB0316 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1the enforcement of this Act. 2    (c) Any civil penalties collected from the enforcement of 3this Act shall be deposited as follows:4        (1) Prior to January 1, 2032, if the Attorney General 5    commenced the action, 75% of any penalty shall be 6    deposited into the Attorney General Court Ordered and 7    Voluntary Compliance Payment Projects Fund and 25% shall 8    be deposited into the Statewide 9-8-8 Trust Fund.9        (2) Prior to January 1, 2032, if a State's Attorney 10    commenced the action, 75% of any penalty shall be 11    distributed to the county and deposited into a special 12    fund in the county treasury and appropriated to the 13    State's Attorney for use in accordance with law and 25% 14    shall be deposited into the Statewide 9-8-8 Trust Fund.15        (3) On and after January 1, 2032, if the Attorney 16    General commenced the action, 50% of any penalty shall be 17    deposited into the Attorney General Court Ordered and 18    Voluntary Compliance Payment Projects Fund and 50% shall 19    be deposited into the Statewide 9-8-8 Trust Fund.20        (4) On and after January 1, 2032, if a State's 21    Attorney commenced the action, 50% of any penalty shall be 22    distributed to the county and deposited into a special 23    fund in the county treasury and appropriated to the 24    State's Attorney for use in accordance with law and 50% 25    shall be deposited into the Statewide 9-8-8 Trust Fund.26    (d) Moneys in the Attorney General Court Ordered and   SB0316 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1Voluntary Compliance Payment Projects Fund shall be used, 2subject to appropriation, for the performance of any function 3pertaining to the exercise of the duties of the Attorney 4General, including, but not limited to, enforcement of any law 5of this State and conducting public education programs. Any 6moneys in the Fund that are required by the court or by an 7agreement to be used for a particular purpose shall be used for 8that purpose. 9    Section 25. Action for actual damages. Any person who 10suffers actual damage as a result of a violation of this Act 11may bring an action under Section 10a of the Consumer Fraud and 12Deceptive Business Practices Act. 13    Section 30. Application. The remedies provided in this Act 14are cumulative and do not preclude any other lawful civil, 15administrative, or criminal remedy available under State or 16federal law, including, but not limited to, product liability 17actions. 18    Section 35. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 19Section 6z-134 as follows: 20    (30 ILCS 105/6z-134)21    Sec. 6z-134. Statewide 9-8-8 Trust Fund.22    (a) The Statewide 9-8-8 Trust Fund is created as a special   SB0316 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1fund in the State treasury. This Fund is administered by the 2Department of Human Services. Moneys in the Fund shall be used 3by the Department of Human Services for the purposes of 4establishing and maintaining a statewide 9-8-8 suicide 5prevention and mental health crisis system pursuant to the 6National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020 as codified 7in 47 U.S.C. 251 and 251a and any subsequent amendments, the 8Federal Communication Commission's rules adopted to administer 9the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020 as 10codified in 47 U.S.C. 251 and 251a and any subsequent 11amendments, and national guidelines for crisis care. The Fund 12shall consist of:13        (1) appropriations by the General Assembly;14        (2) grants and gifts intended for deposit in the Fund;15        (3) interest, premiums, gains, or other earnings on 16    the Fund;17        (3.1) proceeds from the statewide 9-8-8 surcharge 18    imposed under Sections 3 and 4 of the Telecommunication 19    Excise Tax Act; and 20        (3.2) fees, fines, and penalties collected under the 21    Artificial Intelligence Companion Model Safety Act; and 22        (4) moneys received from any other source that are 23    deposited in or transferred into the Fund.24    (b) Moneys in the Fund:25        (1) do not revert at the end of any State fiscal year 26    but remain available for the purposes of the Fund in   SB0316 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1    subsequent State fiscal years;2        (2) are not subject to transfer to any other Fund or to 3    transfer, assignment, or reassignment for any other use or 4    purpose outside of those specified in this Section; and5        (3) shall be used by the Department of Human Services 6    to pay expenses pursuant to 47 U.S.C. 251a.7    (c) An annual report of Fund deposits and expenditures 8shall be made to the General Assembly and the Federal 9Communications Commission by the Department of Human Services 10pursuant to 47 U.S.C. 251a.11    (d) (Blank). 12    (e) For the purposes of this Section, "statewide 9-8-8 13suicide prevention and mental health crisis system" means the 14core elements or pillars of the crisis system, as described by 15the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration, 16and includes Illinois' 9-8-8 Lifeline Contact Centers, 17community crisis response services, including mobile crisis 18teams, and crisis receiving and stabilization facilities and 19programs, including Living Room Programs. 20(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 21    Section 40. The Wellness and Oversight for Psychological 22Resources Act is amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 23    (225 ILCS 155/35)24    Sec. 35. Exceptions. This Act does not apply to the   SB0316 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 06437 SPS 16473 b1following:2        (1) religious counseling;3        (2) peer support; and4        (3) self-help materials and educational resources that 5    are available to the public and do not purport to offer 6    therapy or psychotherapy services; and .7        (4) a chatbot that complies with the Artificial 8    Intelligence Companion Model Safety Act and does not 9    provide therapy or psychotherapy services. 10(Source: P.A. 104-54, eff. 8-1-25.) 11    Section 45. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 12Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 13    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)14    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Artificial Intelligence 15Companion Model Safety Act. Any person who violates the 16Artificial Intelligence Companion Model Safety Act commits an 17unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act. 18    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 19severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 211, 2027.